Utah statutes.
17-30-14.   Temporary appointment.

A temporary appointment for a period not exceeding 60 days may be made, pending examination, when there is no eligible, promotion, or re-employment register in existence.



Enacted by Statewide Initiative A, Nov. 8, 1960

